tests/numerals.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../krc.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../krc.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] Numerals":
    10<num><subst><loc> : 10-да
    10<num><subst><acc> : 10-ну
    10<num><ord> : 10-чу
    112<num><ord> : 112-чи
    115<num><ord> : 115-чи
    116<num><ord> : 116-чы
    11<num><ord> : 11-чы
    121<num><ord> : 121-чи
    122<num><ord> : 122-чи
    123<num><ord> : 123-чю
    124<num><ord> : 124-чю
    125<num><ord> : 125-чи
    126<num><ord> : 126-чы
    127<num><ord> : 127-чи
    128<num><ord> : 128-чи
    129<num><ord> : 129-чу
    12<num><subst><loc> : 12-де
    12<num><subst><abl> : 12-ден
    12<num><ord> : 12-чи
    13000<num><subst><abl> : 13000-ден
    130<num><ord> : 130-чу
    130<num><ord> : 130-чы
    131<num><ord> : 131-чы
    132<num><ord> : 132-чи
    133<num><subst><acc> : 133-ню
    133<num><ord> : 133-чю
    134<num><ord> : 134-чю
    135<num><ord> : 135-чи
    136<num><ord> : 136-чы
    137<num><ord> : 137-чи
    138<num><ord> : 138-чи
    139<num><ord> : 139-чу
    13<num><ord> : 13-чю
    140<num><ord> : 140-чу
    140<num><ord> : 140-чы
    141<num><ord> : 141-чи
    142<num><ord> : 142-чи
    143<num><ord> : 143-чю
    144<num><ord> : 144-чю
    145<num><ord> : 145-чи
    146<num><ord> : 146-чы
    147<num><ord> : 147-чи
    148<num><ord> : 148-чи
    149<num><ord> : 149-чу
    14<num><ord> : 14-чю
    14<num><ord><subst><px3sp><nom>+э<cop><aor><p3><sg> : 14-чюдю
    150<num><ord> : 150-чи
    150<num><ord> : 150-чы
    151<num><ord> : 151-чи
    152<num><ord> : 152-чи
    153<num><ord> : 153-чю
    154<num><ord> : 154-чю
    1550<num><ord> : 1550-чи
    155<num><ord> : 155-чи
    156<num><ord> : 156-чы
    157<num><ord> : 157-чи
    158<num><ord> : 158-чи
    159<num><ord> : 159-чу
    15<num><subst><loc> : 15-де
    15<num><ord> : 15-чи
    160<num><ord> : 160-чи
    160<num><ord> : 160-чы
    161<num><ord> : 161-чи
    162<num><ord> : 162-чи
    163<num><ord> : 163-чю
    164<num><ord> : 164-чю
    165<num><ord> : 165-чи
    166<num><ord> : 166-чы
    167<num><ord> : 167-чи
    168<num><ord> : 168-чи
    169<num><ord> : 169-чу
    16<num><ord> : 16-чи
    16<num><ord> : 16-чы
    170<num><ord> : 170-чи
    170<num><ord> : 170-чы
    171<num><ord> : 171-чи
    172<num><ord> : 172-чи
    1730<num><ord> : 1730-чи
    173<num><ord> : 173-чю
    174<num><ord> : 174-чю
    175<num><ord> : 175-чи
    176<num><ord> : 176-чы
    177<num><ord> : 177-чи
    1780<num><ord> : 1780-чы
    178<num><ord> : 178-чи
    179<num><ord> : 179-чу
    17<num><subst><loc> : 17-де
    17<num><ord> : 17-чи
    1808<num><ord> : 1808-чи
    180<num><ord> : 180-чи
    180<num><ord> : 180-чы
    181<num><ord> : 181-чи
    182<num><ord> : 182-чи
    1830<num><ord> : 1830-чу
    183<num><ord> : 183-чю
    1840<num><ord> : 1840-чи
    1840<num><ord> : 1840-чы
    184<num><ord> : 184-чю
    185<num><ord> : 185-чи
    1860<num><ord> : 1860-чы
    186<num><ord> : 186-чы
    187<num><ord> : 187-чи
    1880<num><ord> : 1880-чи
    1881<num><ord> : 1881-чи
    1884<num><ord> : 1884-чю
    188<num><ord> : 188-чи
    1890<num><ord> : 1890-чы
    189<num><ord> : 189-чу
    189<num><ord> : 189-чю
    18<num><ord> : 18-чи
    1900<num><ord> : 1900-чу
    1902<num><subst><abl> : 1902-ден
    1904<num><ord> : 1904-чю
    1906<num><ord> : 1906-чу
    1906<num><ord> : 1906-чы
    190<num><ord> : 190-чи
    1913<num><ord> : 1913-чю
    1914<num><ord> : 1914-чю
    1916<num><ord> : 1916-чы
    1918<num><ord> : 1918-чи
    191<num><ord> : 191-чи
    1920<num><ord> : 1920-чы
    1921<num><ord> : 1921-чи
    1922<num><ord> : 1922-чи
    1924<num><ord> : 1924-чю
    1926<num><ord> : 1926-чы
    1928<num><ord> : 1928-чи
    192<num><ord> : 192-чи
    1930<num><ord> : 1930-чу
    1931<num><ord> : 1931-чи
    1931<num><ord> : 1931-чю
    1933<num><ord> : 1933-чю
    1934<num><ord> : 1934-чю
    1936<num><ord> : 1936-чы
    1937<num><ord> : 1937-чи
    1938<num><ord> : 1938-чи
    1939<num><ord> : 1939-чу
    193<num><ord> : 193-чю
    1940<num><ord> : 1940-чы
    1946<num><ord> : 1946-чы
    194<num><ord> : 194-чю
    1950<num><ord> : 1950-чи
    1958<num><ord> : 1958-чи
    195<num><ord> : 195-чи
    1960<num><ord> : 1960-чы
    1965<num><ord> : 1965-чи
    196<num><ord> : 196-чы
    1970<num><ord> : 1970-чи
    197<num><ord> : 197-чи
    1980<num><ord> : 1980-чи
    1980<num><ord> : 1980-чы
    198<num><ord> : 198-чи
    1990<num><ord> : 1990-чы
    199<num><ord> : 199-чу
    19<num><subst><loc> : 19-да
    19<num><ord> : 19-чу
    1<num><subst><loc> : 1-де
    1<num><ord> : 1-чи
    20000<num><subst><px2sg><dat> : 20000-нге
    2000<num><ord> : 2000-чи
    2004<num><ord> : 2004-чю
    2008<num><subst><abl> : 2008-ден
    200<num><ord> : 200-чи
    200<num><ord> : 200-чю
    201<num><ord> : 201-чи
    202<num><ord> : 202-чи
    203<num><ord> : 203-чю
    204<num><ord> : 204-чю
    205<num><ord> : 205-чи
    206<num><ord> : 206-чы
    207<num><ord> : 207-чи
    208<num><ord> : 208-чи
    209<num><ord> : 209-чу
    20<num><subst><abl> : 20-дан
    20<num><ord> : 20-чы
    20<num><ord><subst><px3sp><nom>+э<cop><aor><p3><sg> : 20-чыды
    210<num><ord> : 210-чу
    210<num><ord> : 210-чю
    211<num><ord> : 211-чи
    212<num><ord> : 212-чи
    213<num><ord> : 213-чю
    219018<num><subst><acc> : 219018-ни
    21<num><ord> : 21-чи
    22<num><ord> : 22-чи
    23<num><ord> : 23-чи
    23<num><ord> : 23-чю
    23<num><ord><subst><px3sp><dat> : 23-чюсюне
    244<num><ord> : 244-чю
    245<num><ord> : 245-чи
    246<num><ord> : 246-чы
    247<num><ord> : 247-чи
    248<num><ord> : 248-чи
    249<num><ord> : 249-чу
    24<num><ord> : 24-чи
    24<num><ord> : 24-чю
    250<num><ord> : 250-чи
    250<num><ord> : 250-чы
    251<num><ord> : 251-чи
    252<num><ord> : 252-чи
    253<num><ord> : 253-чю
    254<num><ord> : 254-чю
    255<num><ord> : 255-чи
    256<num><ord> : 256-чы
    257<num><ord> : 257-чи
    258<num><ord> : 258-чи
    259<num><ord> : 259-чу
    25<num><subst><dat> : 25-ге
    25<num><subst><loc> : 25-де
    25<num><ord> : 25-чи
    260<num><ord> : 260-чи
    260<num><ord> : 260-чы
    261<num><ord> : 261-чи
    262<num><ord> : 262-чи
    263<num><ord> : 263-чю
    264<num><ord> : 264-чю
    265<num><ord> : 265-чи
    266<num><ord> : 266-чы
    267<num><ord> : 267-чи
    268<num><ord> : 268-чи
    269<num><ord> : 269-чу
    26<num><subst><loc> : 26-да
    26<num><ord> : 26-чи
    26<num><ord> : 26-чы
    270<num><ord> : 270-чи
    270<num><ord> : 270-чы
    271<num><ord> : 271-чи
    272<num><ord> : 272-чи
    273<num><ord> : 273-чю
    274<num><ord> : 274-чю
    278<num><ord> : 278-чи
    279<num><ord> : 279-чу
    27<num><subst><loc> : 27-де
    27<num><ord> : 27-чи
    27<num><ord><subst><abl> : 27-чиден
    28<num><ord> : 28-чи
    28<num><ord> : 28-чы
    29<num><ord> : 29-чу
    2<num><subst><abl> : 2-ден
    2<num><ord> : 2-чи
    3000<num><subst><px2sg><dat> : 3000-нге
    305<num><ord> : 305-чи
    306<num><ord> : 306-чы
    307<num><ord> : 307-чи
    308<num><ord> : 308-чи
    309<num><ord> : 309-чу
    30<num><subst><dat> : 30-гъа
    30<num><subst><loc> : 30-да
    30<num><subst><abl> : 30-дан
    30<num><ord> : 30-чи
    30<num><ord> : 30-чу
    30<num><ord> : 30-чы
    310<num><ord> : 310-чу
    310<num><ord> : 310-чю
    311<num><ord> : 311-чи
    312<num><ord> : 312-чи
    313<num><ord> : 313-чю
    314<num><ord> : 314-чю
    315<num><ord> : 315-чи
    316<num><ord> : 316-чы
    317<num><ord> : 317-чи
    318<num><ord> : 318-чи
    319<num><ord> : 319-чу
    31<num><subst><loc> : 31-де
    31<num><subst><abl> : 31-ден
    31<num><ord> : 31-чи
    320<num><ord> : 320-чу
    320<num><ord> : 320-чы
    321<num><ord> : 321-чи
    322<num><ord> : 322-чи
    323<num><ord> : 323-чю
    324<num><ord> : 324-чю
    325<num><ord> : 325-чи
    326<num><ord> : 326-чы
    327<num><ord> : 327-чи
    328<num><ord> : 328-чи
    329<num><ord> : 329-чу
    32<num><subst><abl> : 32-ден
    32<num><ord> : 32-чи
    330<num><ord> : 330-чу
    330<num><ord> : 330-чы
    331<num><ord> : 331-чи
    332<num><ord> : 332-чи
    333<num><ord> : 333-чю
    334<num><ord> : 334-чю
    335<num><ord> : 335-чи
    33<num><ord> : 33-чи
    33<num><ord> : 33-чю
    346<num><ord> : 346-чы
    347<num><ord> : 347-чи
    34<num><ord> : 34-чю
    358<num><ord> : 358-чи
    359<num><ord> : 359-чу
    35<num><ord> : 35-чи
    36<num><ord> : 36-чы
    37<num><ord> : 37-чи
    38<num><ord> : 38-чи
    39<num><ord> : 39-чу
    39<num><ord><subst><px3sp><nom>+э<cop><aor><p3><sg> : 39-чуду
    3<num><ord> : 3-чи
    3<num><ord> : 3-чю
    403<num><ord> : 403-чю
    40<num><subst><dat> : 40-гъа
    40<num><ord> : 40-чы
    415<num><ord> : 415-чи
    41<num><ord> : 41-чи
    42<num><ord> : 42-чи
    43<num><ord> : 43-чю
    44<num><ord> : 44-чю
    45<num><ord> : 45-чи
    46<num><ord> : 46-чу
    46<num><ord> : 46-чы
    47<num><ord> : 47-чи
    48<num><ord> : 48-чи
    49<num><subst><abl> : 49-дан
    49<num><ord> : 49-чу
    4<num><ord> : 4-чю
    5000<num><subst><abl> : 5000-ден
    500<num><ord> : 500-чю
    50<num><subst><abl> : 50-ден
    50<num><subst><acc> : 50-ни
    50<num><ord> : 50-чи
    51<num><subst><abl> : 51-ден
    51<num><ord> : 51-чи
    52<num><ord> : 52-чи
    53<num><ord> : 53-чю
    54<num><ord> : 54-чю
    55<num><ord> : 55-чи
    55<num><ord><subst><px3sp><nom>+э<cop><aor><p3><sg> : 55-чиди
    56<num><ord> : 56-чы
    57<num><ord> : 57-чи
    58<num><ord> : 58-чи
    59<num><ord> : 59-чу
    5<num><subst><abl> : 5-ден
    5<num><ord> : 5-чи
    60<num><subst><abl> : 60-дан
    60<num><ord> : 60-чы
    61<num><ord> : 61-чи
    61<num><ord> : 61-чы
    62<num><ord> : 62-чи
    62<num><ord> : 62-чы
    63<num><ord> : 63-чи
    63<num><ord> : 63-чю
    64<num><ord> : 64-чю
    65<num><subst><abl> : 65-ден
    65<num><ord> : 65-чи
    65<num><ord> : 65-чю
    67<num><subst><loc> : 67-де
    68<num><ord> : 68-чи
    69<num><ord> : 69-чу
    6<num><subst><dat> : 6-гъа
    6<num><subst><loc> : 6-да
    6<num><ord> : 6-чи
    6<num><ord> : 6-чы
    70<num><subst><abl> : 70-ден
    70<num><ord> : 70-чи
    7<num><subst><dat> : 7-ге
    7<num><subst><loc> : 7-де
    7<num><subst><abl> : 7-ден
    7<num><subst><acc> : 7-ни
    7<num><ord> : 7-чи
    800<num><ord> : 800-чю
    80<num><ord> : 80-чы
    89<num><subst><dat> : 89-гъа
    89<num><ord> : 89-чу
    8<num><subst><loc> : 8-де
    8<num><subst><abl> : 8-ден
    8<num><ord> : 8-чи
    90<num><ord> : 90-чы
    93<num><ord> : 93-чю
    94<num><ord> : 94-чю
    9<num><ord> : 9-чу
